Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2355.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 68, article 2, section 2, subdivision 9, as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 104, article 1, section 105, is amended to read: Subd. 9. U.S. Highway 8; Chisago County 42,000,000 This appropriation is for predesign, design, engineering, and reconstruction of marked U.S. Highway 8 from Karmel Avenue in Chisago City to marked Interstate Highway 35, including pedestrian and bike trails along and crossings of this segment of marked U.S. Highway 8. The reconstruction project may include expanding segments of marked U.S. Highway 8 to four lanes, constructing or reconstructing frontage roads and backage roads, and realigning local roads to consolidate, remove, and relocate access onto and off of U.S. Highway 8. This appropriation is for the portion of the project that is eligible for use of proceeds of trunk highway bonds. new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642, the bond sale authorization and appropriation of bond sale proceeds for this project are available until December 31, 2029.new text end